Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.010

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a legal and regulatory framework for operation by alien banks in the state of Washington that will:

(1) Create a financial climate which will benefit the economy of the state of Washington;

(2) Provide a well regulated and supervised financial system to assist the movement of foreign capital into Washington state for the support and diversification of the local industrial base;

(3) Assist the development of the economy of the state of Washington without disrupting business relationships of state and federal financial institutions.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.42.010.]